District of Columbia statutes.
1-1162.10

Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Fund.

(a)

There is established as a nonlapsing fund the Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Fund (“Accountability Fund”), which shall be administered by the Ethics Board. The funds in the Accountability Fund shall be used exclusively by the Ethics Board. All fines collected under § 1-1162.21 and part E of this subchapter shall be deposited into the Accountability Fund.

(b)

All funds deposited into the Accountability Fund, and any interest earned on those funds, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the uses and purposes set forth in this subchapter without regard to fiscal year limitation, subject to authorization by Congress.

History

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 210, 59 DCR 1862